Utah statutes.
63C-7-210 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Exemption from certain acts.

(1)  The Utah Communications Agency Network is exempt from:

(a) Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(b)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code, except as provided in Section 63A-4-205.5;

(c) Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(d) Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act; and

(e)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The board shall adopt budgetary procedures, accounting, procurement, and personnel policies substantially similar to those from which they have been exempted in Subsection (1).

